Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.796

[Art. 133] Conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman.

Any commissioned officer who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 118.]